en: Frozen mashed vegetables
fr: Purées de légumes surgelées

en: Tabbouleh, tabouleh, tabouli, tabbouli
de: Taboulé, Tabouleh, Tabbouleh, Bulgursalat
es: Tabulé, Tabbule, Tabbouleh
fr: Taboulés, Taboulé, Salade de couscous, Salades de couscous
hr: Tabuleh
it: Tabbouleh
ja: タッブーレ
nl: Tabouleh

en: Filled fritters
fr: Bricks garnis

en: Filled fritter garnished with shrimps and vegetables and poultry and meat, Filo pastry garnished with shrimps and vegetables and poultry and meat
fr: Brick garni aux crevettes et légumes et volaille et viande et poisson

en: Filled fritter assortment, Filled filo pastry assortment
fr: Assortiment de brick garnies

en: Filled fritter garnished with shrimps, Filo pastry garnished with shrimps
fr: Brick aux crevettes, Brick garni aux crevettes

en: Filled fritter garnished with vegetables, Filo pastry garnished with vegetables
fr: Brick aux légumes, Brick garni aux légumes

en: Filled fritter garnished with poultry, Filo pastry garnished with poultry
fr: Brick à la volaille, Brick garni à la volaille

en: Filled fritter garnished with meat, Filo pastry garnished with meat
fr: Brick à la viande, Brick garni à la viande

en: Filled fritter garnished with fish, Filo pastry garnished with fish
fr: Brick au poisson, Brick garni au poisson

en: Fritter filled with eggs, Filo pastry filled with eggs
fr: Brick à l'oeuf

en: Fritter filled with beef, Filo pastry filled with beef
fr: Brick au boeuf

en: Fritter filled with potatoes, Filo pastry filled with potatoes
fr: Brick à la pomme de terre

en: Tabbouleh with Olive oil
de: Tabboulehs mit Olivenöl
es: Tabulé con aceite de oliva
fr: Taboulés à l'huile d'olive, Taboulé à l'huile d'olive
hr: Tabule s maslinovim uljem
it: Rabbouleh con Olio d'Oliva
nl: Tabouleh met Olijfolie

en: Chicken Tabbouleh, Tabbouleh with chicken
de: Hünchen-Taboulé
fr: Taboulés au poulet, Taboulé au poulet, Salade de couscous au poulet
hr: Pileći tabule
nl: Kiptaboulehs

en: Tabbouleh with fresh vegetables
de: Taboulé mit frischem Gemüse
fr: Taboulés aux légumes, taboulé aux légumes, Taboulés aux légumes frais, Taboulé aux légumes frais
hr: Tabule sa svježim povrćem
nl: Tabouleh met Groenten

en: Tabbouleh with tomatoes, tomato tabouleh
de: Taboulé mit Tomaten
fr: Taboulés aux tomates, Taboulé aux tomates
hr: Tabule s rajčicama
nl: Taboulehs met Tomaten

en: Eastern tabbouleh, Eastern tabouleh, Oriental tabouleh, Oriental tabbouleh, Oriental tabouli, Oriental tabbouli, Eastern tabouli, Eastern tabbouli
fr: Taboulés orientaux, Taboulé oriental, Taboulé à l'orientale, Taboulés à l'orientale
hr: Istočni tabule
it: Tabbouleh orientale
nl: Oosterse Taboulehs

en: Royal tabbouleh
fr: Taboulés royaux, Taboulé royal
hr: Kraljevski tabule
nl: Royal tabbouleh

en: Terrines
bg: Терин
ca: Terrines
de: Terrinen
es: Terrinas
fi: terriinit
fr: Terrines
hr: Terine
it: Terrine
ja: テリーヌ
nl: Terrines, Vleespotten, Terrine, Vleespo
pt: Terrinas
zh: 法式冻派